Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 11. Competitive Intrastate Long Distance Telephone Service.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 12, ch. 93, SLA 1990 provided that if an administrative agency or a court made a determination that was in effect on September 4, 1990, that required the lieutenant governor to place one or both of certain initiatives on the 1990 general election ballot, AS

42.05.800

—

42.05.890

were repealed. That contingency did not occur, so §§ 4, 7, and 8, ch. 93, SLA 1990 did not take effect.

Sec. 42.05.800.
Findings.

The legislature finds that

modern, affordable, efficient, and universally available local and long distance telephone service is essential to the people of the state;

facilities based, long distance telephone service should be provided competitively wherever possible;

technological advances, reduced costs, and increased consumer choices for long distance telephone service, resulting from the adoption of an appropriate competitive market structure, will enhance the state’s economic development;

the benefits of competition in long distance telephone service should be shared by consumers throughout the state;

the commission should oversee competition in long distance telephone service to ensure that the competition is fair to consumers and competitors;

the commission should provide for competition in a timely manner and should adopt regulations that eliminate inappropriate impediments to entry for long distance carriers fit, willing, and able to provide service.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For telephone utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 3.

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

For procedures for changing an authorized telecommunications carrier, see 3 AAC 53, art. 3.

For local exchange competition, see 3 AAC 53, art. 4.

For universal service fund, see 3 AAC 53, art. 5.

For state telecommunications modernization plan, see 3 AAC 53, art. 8.

For public interest pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 9.

Sec. 42.05.810.
Competition.

History.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 24 SLA 2019.]

Sec. 42.05.820.
No municipal regulation.

A long distance telephone company or a local exchange carrier that is exempted in whole or in part from complying with all or a portion of this chapter may not be regulated by a municipality under AS

29.35.060

and

29.35.070

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1990; am § 11 ch 24 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective November 27, 2019, inserted “or a local exchange carrier” following “telephone company”.

Sec. 42.05.830.
Exchange access charges.

In providing for competition under AS

42.05.800

—

42.05.890

, the commission shall establish a system of access charges to be paid by long distance carriers to compensate local exchange carriers for the cost of originating and terminating long distance services.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Sec. 42.05.840.
Universal service fund.

The commission may establish a universal service fund or other mechanism to be used to ensure the provision of long distance telephone service at reasonable rates throughout the state and to otherwise preserve universal service.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For universal service fund, see 3 AAC 53, art. 5.

For public interest pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 9.

Sec. 42.05.850.
Exchange carrier association.

The commission may require the local exchange carriers to form an association to assist in administering the system of access charges and may require the association to file tariffs and to engage in pooling of exchange access costs and revenue if necessary to achieve the purposes of AS

42.05.800

—

42.05.890

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1990)

Sec. 42.05.860.
Restrictions on resale of telecommunications services prohibited.

A telephone company may not prohibit or restrict the resale of telecommunications service.
If an interexchange telecommunications service is resold, the reseller shall receive credit in an appropriate amount for an applicable exchange access charge if the credit is necessary to prevent double payment of the access charges.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1990)

Sec. 42.05.890.
Definitions.

In AS

42.05.800

—

42.05.890

,

“local exchange carrier” means any carrier certificated to provide local telephone services;

“long distance carrier” or “long distance telephone company” means any carrier certificated to provide long distance telephone services;

“long distance telephone service” or “long distance service” means intrastate, interexchange telephone service.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

42.05.995

. Renumbered in 1990.